Missouri, session 2026, HB3113.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 161.506, RSMo, is repealed and five new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 8.990, 9.507, 161.506, 590.198, and 590.1700, to read as
follows:
8.990. 1. The administrator of each public building shall maintain a supply of
naloxone for use in case of a suspected overdose in or on the grounds of the public
building. For purposes of this section, "public building" means a building owned,
leased, or operated by a governmental subdivision of the state including, but not limited
to, a city, county, or school district.
2. The naloxone and instructions for its use shall be stored:
(1) Inside the public building's first aid kit, if any; and
(2) In the same location as the public building's automated external
defibrillators, if any.
3. The public building shall make all reasonable efforts to notify all occupants of
the building:
(1) That there is naloxone on the property;
(2) Where the naloxone is located; and
(3) That emergency personnel should be contacted if the naloxone is
administered.
9.507. The month of October each year is hereby designated as "Fentanyl
Poisoning Awareness Month" in Missouri. The citizens of this state are encouraged to
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 3113 2
participate in appropriate events and activities to raise awareness about the dangers of
fentanyl use and the risks of overdose and poisoning from ingesting fentanyl.
161.506. 1. Law enforcement agencies and school districts receiving funds under
sections 161.500 to 161.508 shall concentrate enhanced apprehension, prevention and
education efforts and resources on drug and alcohol use and drug trafficking in and around
schools, parks and playgrounds. Such enhanced apprehension, prevention, and education
efforts shall include, but not be limited to:
(1) Drug and alcohol traffic intervention programs;
(2) School- and classroom-oriented programs, using tested drug and alcohol
education curriculum that provides in-depth and accurate information on drugs and alcohol,
which may include the participation of local law enforcement agencies and qualified drug and
alcohol use prevention specialists and which are designed to increase teachers' and students'
awareness of drugs and alcohol and their effects;
(3) Family-oriented programs aimed at preventing drug and alcohol use, which may
include the participation of community-based organizations experienced in the successful
operation of such programs;
(4) The establishment of a local drug-free school advisory committee. The committee
shall be established and appointed by the school board of each school district. The committee
may be a newly created committee or an existing local drug and alcohol use committee as
designated by the appointing authority. The committee shall be composed of, at a minimum,
the following:
(a) Local and law enforcement executives;
(b) School district administrators;
(c) School-site staff, which includes administrators, teachers and certified personnel;
(d) Parents;
(e) Students;
(f) School peace officers;
(g) State, county, or local drug and alcohol program administrators designated
pursuant to chapter 195; and
(h) Drug and alcohol prevention program executives;
(5) Development and distribution of appropriate written and audiovisual aids for
training of school and law enforcement staff for handling drug- and alcohol-related problems
and offenses. Appropriate existing aids may be used in lieu of the development of new
materials;
(6) Development of prevention and intervention programs for elementary school
teachers and students, including utilization of existing prevention and intervention programs;

HCS HB 3113 3
(7) Development of a coordinated intervention system that identifies students with
chronic drug and alcohol abuse treatment programs; and
(8) Development of education programs on fentanyl use and poisoning for
students in grades six through twelve.
2. Enhanced apprehension, prevention, and education efforts commenced under this
section shall be a joint effort between law enforcement agencies and local school districts.
These efforts shall include, but are not limited to, the concentration of apprehension efforts in
problem areas cooperatively identified by local school and law enforcement authorities.
3. Funds appropriated pursuant to sections 161.500 to 161.508 may be used in part to
support state-level development and statewide distribution of appropriate written and
audiovisual aids for public awareness and training of school and law enforcement staff for
handling drug- and alcohol-related problems and offenses. When existing aids can be
identified, these aids may be used in lieu of the development of new aids.
590.198. Prior to January 1, 2028, every law enforcement agency in the state
shall participate in training provided through the POST program's Operation Overdose
(OD) Justice Initiative.
590.1700. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any drug-related death
shall be fully investigated by the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction, regardless of
whether criminal charges have been filed.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any drug-related death shall be
treated by the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction in the same manner as a
homicide crime scene.
✔